en: Dentistry
xx: Dentistry
cs: Stomatologie
da: Tandlæge
de: Zahnmedizin
es: Odontología
fr: Médecine dentaire
it: Odontoiatria
ja: 歯科
nl: Tandheelkunde
no: Tannlegepraksis
pl: Stomatologia
pt: Odontologia
ru: Стоматология
sv: Tandläkararbete
tr: Diş Hekimliği

en: Dental Cement
xx: Dental Cement
cs: Zubní cement
da: Tandcement
de: Zahnzement
es: Cemento dental
fr: Ciment dentaire
it: Cemento dentale
ja: 歯科用セメント
nl: Tandcement
no: Tannsement
pl: Cement dentystyczny
pt: Cimento odontológico
ru: Зубной цемент
sv: Tandcement
tr: Diş Sementi

en: Dental Tools
xx: Dental Tools
cs: Zubařské nástroje
da: Tandlægeredskaber
de: Zahnmedizinische Instrumente
es: Utensilios dentales
fr: Instruments dentaires
it: Strumenti da dentista
ja: デンタルツール
nl: Tandartsinstrumenten
no: Tannlegeverktøy
pl: Narzędzia dentystyczne
pt: Instrumentos odontológicos
ru: Стоматологические инструменты
sv: Tandläkarverktyg
tr: Dişçi Aletleri

en: Dappen Dishes
xx: Dappen Dishes
cs: Míchací nádobky
da: Kopper
de: Dappengläser
es: Vasos dappen
fr: Godets Dappen
it: Dappen
ja: ダッペンディッシュ
nl: Dappenglaasjes
no: Blandekopper
pl: Małe naczynia do mieszania
pt: Potes Dappen
ru: Двусторонние стаканчики
sv: Dappenglas
tr: Karıştırma Fincanları

en: Dental Mirrors
xx: Dental Mirrors
cs: Zubařská zrcátka
da: Tandlægespejl
de: Dentalspiegel
es: Espejos dentales
fr: Miroirs dentaires
it: Specchi da dentista
ja: デンタルミラー
nl: Tandspiegeltjes
no: Tannlegespeil
pl: Lusterka dentystyczne
pt: Espelhos odontológicos
ru: Стоматологические зеркала
sv: Tandläkarspeglar
tr: Dişçi Aynaları

en: Dental Tool Sets
xx: Dental Tool Sets
cs: Sady zubařských nástrojů
da: Tandlægeredskabssæt
de: Zahnmedizinische Instrumentensets
es: Juegos de utensilios dentales
fr: Ensembles d'instruments dentaires
it: Set di strumenti da dentista
ja: デンタルツールセット
nl: Sets met tandartsinstrumenten
no: Verktøysett for tannleger
pl: Zestawy narzędzi dentystycznych
pt: Conjuntos de intrumentos odontológicos
ru: Наборы стоматологических инструментов
sv: Verktygsset för tandläkare
tr: Dişçi Alet Setleri

en: Prophy Cups
xx: Prophy Cups
cs: Profylaktické pohárky
da: Fingerkopper (profylakse)
de: Prophy-Kelche
es: Copas de pulido
fr: Cupules de prophylaxie
it: Coppette per profilassi
ja: プロフィーカップ
nl: Polijstcups
no: Gummikopper (profylakse)
pl: Gumki do polerowania zębów
pt: Taças profiláticas
ru: Профилактические стоматологические насадки
sv: Polerkoppar
tr: Polisaj Lastikleri

en: Prophy Heads
xx: Prophy Heads
cs: Profylaktické hlavice
da: Børstehoveder (profylakse)
de: Prophy-Köpfe
es: Cabezales de pulido
fr: Micromoteurs de prophylaxie
it: Testine per profilassi
ja: プロフィーヘッド
nl: Polijstkoppen
no: Børstehoder (profylakse)
pl: Głowice do polerowania zębów
pt: Escovas profiláticas
ru: Профилактические стоматологические головки
sv: Polerhuvuden
tr: Polisaj Başlıkları

en: Prophy Paste
xx: Prophy Paste
cs: Profylaktické pasty
da: Tandpasta (profylakse)
de: Prophy-Paste
es: Pasta de pulido
fr: Pâte de polissage
it: Pasta per profilassi
ja: プロフィーペースト
nl: Polijstpasta
no: Pussepasta (profylakse)
pl: Pasty do polerowania zębów
pt: Pasta profilática
ru: Профилактические стоматологические пасты
sv: Polerpasta
tr: Polisaj Macunu

en: Film & Television
xx: Film & Television
cs: Film a televize
da: Film og tv
de: Film & Fernsehen
es: Cine y televisión
fr: Cinéma et télévision
it: Cinema e televisione
ja: 映画・テレビ
nl: Film en televisie
no: Film og TV
pl: Film i telewizja
pt: Filmes e televisão
ru: Кино и телевидение
sv: Film och TV
tr: Film ve Televizyon

en: Finance & Insurance
xx: Finance & Insurance
cs: Finance a pojišťovnictví
da: Finans og forsikring
de: Finanzwesen & Versicherung
es: Finanzas y seguros
fr: Finance et assurance
it: Finanza e assicurazione
ja: 金融・保険
nl: Financiën en verzekeringen
no: Finans og forsikring
pl: Finanse i ubezpieczenia
pt: Finanças e seguros
ru: Финансы и страхование
sv: Finans och försäkring
tr: Finans ve Sigorta

en: Bullion
xx: Bullion
cs: Neražené drahé kovy
da: Møntmetal
de: Bullion
es: Lingotes
fr: Lingot
it: Lingotti
ja: 地金
nl: Goud- en zilverstaven
no: Umyntet edelmetall
pl: Sztabki metali szlachetnych
pt: Barras de ouro ou prata
ru: Слитки
sv: Metalltackor
tr: Külçe Altın

en: Food Service
xx: Food Service
cs: Cateringové služby
da: Catering
de: Nahrungsmittelservice
es: Restauración
fr: Restauration
it: Ristorazione
ja: 飲食業
nl: Catering en horeca
no: Mattjenester
pl: Usługi gastronomiczne
pt: Serviço de gastronomia
ru: Общественное питание
sv: Livsmedelsservice
tr: Yemek Servisi

en: Bakery Boxes
xx: Bakery Boxes
cs: Krabice na pečivo
da: Bageriemballage
de: Backwarenbehälter
es: Cajas para pasteles
fr: Boîtes pâtissières
it: Scatole da panetteria
ja: ベーカリーボックス
nl: Taartdozen
no: Kakeesker
pl: Pudełka cukiernicze
pt: Caixas para itens de padaria
ru: Хлебобулочные контейнеры
sv: Bageriaskar
tr: Unlu Mamul Kutuları

en: Bus Tubs
xx: Bus Tubs
cs: Kontejnery na špinavé nádobí
da: Gastronormkantine
de: Spülwannen
es: Barreños
fr: Bacs à vaisselle
it: Vaschette
ja: 食器用コンテナ
nl: Afruimbakken
no: Ryddefat
pl: Pojemniki na brudne naczynia
pt: Bacias plásticas
ru: Контейнеры для грязной посуды
sv: Diskkorgar
tr: Bulaşık Leğenleri

en: Check Presenters
xx: Check Presenters
cs: Desky na účtenky pro restaurace
da: Regningsmappe
de: Scheck- & Kartenetuis
es: Portacuentas
fr: Présentoirs d'addition
it: Porta conto
ja: 伝票ホルダー
nl: Rekeningmapjes
no: Kortholder
pl: Okładki na rachunek
pt: Porta-conta
ru: Держатели для банковских чеков
sv: Notapärmar
tr: Hesap Sümenleri

en: Concession Food Containers
xx: Concession Food Containers
cs: Jednorázové obaly na potraviny
da: Madbeholdere til bod
de: Takeaway-Behälter
es: Recipientes para comida rápida
fr: Emballages alimentaires pour lieux de loisirs
it: Contenitori ristorazione in concessione
ja: ファストフード・スナック用容器
nl: Snackbakjes
no: Matbeholdere for gatekjøkken
pl: Opakowania do przekąsek
pt: Recipientes para servir alimentos
ru: Рекламные пищевые контейнеры
sv: Behållare för livsmedelsstånd
tr: Aperatif Yiyecek Kapları

en: Disposable Lids
xx: Disposable Lids
cs: Jednorázová víčka
da: Engangslåg
de: Einwegdeckel
es: Tapas desechables
fr: Couvercles jetables
it: Coperchi usa e getta
ja: 使い捨て容器用フタ
nl: Wegwerpdeksels
no: Engangslokk
pl: Pokrywki jednorazowe
pt: Tampas descartáveis
ru: Одноразовые крышки
sv: Engångslock
tr: Tek Kullanımlık Kapaklar

en: Disposable Serveware
xx: Disposable Serveware
cs: Jednorázové nádobí
da: Engangsserveringsbeholdere
de: Einweg-Serviergeschirr
es: Material de servir desechable
fr: Services jetables
it: Coperti monouso
ja: 大皿・取り分け用使い捨て食器
nl: Wegwerpserviesgoed
no: Serveringsartikler til engangsbruk
pl: Naczynia jednorazowe
pt: Utensílios para servir descartáveis
ru: Одноразовые приборы для сервировки
sv: Serveringsartiklar för engångsbruk
tr: Tek Kullanımlık Servis Malzemeleri

en: Disposable Serving Trays
xx: Disposable Serving Trays
cs: Jednorázové servírovací tácy
da: Engangsserveringsbakker
de: Einwegtabletts
es: Bandejas de servir desechables
fr: Plateaux jetables
it: Vassoi monouso
ja: 使い捨てパーティトレー
nl: Wegwerpdienblad
no: Serveringsfat til engangsbruk
pl: Tacki jednorazowe
pt: Bandejas descartáveis
ru: Одноразовые подносы
sv: Engångsbrickor
tr: Tek Kullanımlık Servis Tepsileri